Utah statutes.
53B-6-106.   Jobs Now and Economic Development Initiatives.

(1) (a)  The Utah College of Applied Technology shall develop, establish, and maintain a Jobs Now Initiative, to promote workforce preparation programs that meet critical needs and shortages throughout the state.

(b)  The State Board of Regents shall develop, establish, and maintain economic development initiatives within the system of higher education.

(2)  The initiatives specified in Subsection (1) shall provide support for technical training expansion that trains skilled potential employees within a period not to exceed 12 months for technical jobs in critical needs occupations and other innovative economic development policy initiatives.

(3) (a)  Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall provide an annual appropriation to the Utah College of Applied Technology to fund the Jobs Now Initiative established in Subsection (1)(a).

(b) (i)  The Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees shall allocate the appropriation for the Jobs Now Initiative to college campuses within the college.

(ii)  A college campus shall use money received under Subsection (3)(b)(i) for technical training expansion referred to in Subsection (2).

(c)  Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall provide an annual appropriation to the State Board of Regents to fund economic development initiatives established pursuant Subsection (1)(b).

(d)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:

(i)  the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees shall make rules to implement the Jobs Now Initiative; and 

(ii)  the board shall make rules to implement economic development initiatives.



Amended by Chapter 370, 2009 General Session

